Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.330

Filing of decree of dissolution.

In case the court shall enter a decree dissolving a corporation, it shall be the duty of the court clerk to cause a certified copy of the decree to be filed with the secretary of state. No fee shall be charged by the secretary of state for the filing thereof.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 66.]